Mississippi, session 20251E, SB2004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the support and maintenance of the Mississippi Agricultural and Forestry Experiment Station for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026 $ 24,543,567.00. SECTION 2.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby authorized for expenditure out of any special source funds which are collected by or otherwise become available for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the Mississippi Agricultural and Forestry Experiment Station for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026........................................ ............................................ $ 10,495,120.00. SECTION 3.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2 of this act, One Million Three Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($1,350,000.00) shall be derived from the Education Enhancement Fund from funds deposited pursuant to Sections 27-65-75 and 27-67-31, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 4.  No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds which are being used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. SECTION 5.  It is the intention of the Legislature that if the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act are used directly or indirectly to match or otherwise secure any federal grants, research grants or donations, such special source funds not classified as current restricted funds shall be added and accounted for under Section 2 of this act.  Further, it is the intention of the Legislature that all such aforementioned special source funds be included in all reports and requests for the 2026 Regular Session of the Mississippi Legislature. SECTION 6.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the agency's budget request for Fiscal Year 2027 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2026 budget request process. SECTION 7.  In compliance with the "Mississippi Performance Budget and Strategic Planning Act of 1994," it is the intent of the Legislature that the funds provided herein shall be utilized in the most efficient and effective manner possible to achieve the intended mission of this agency.  Based on the funding authorized, this agency shall make every effort to attain the targeted performance measures provided below: FY2026 Performance Measures                                       Target Plant Systems Number of Scientist FTE (Scientist Years)               29.78 Number of Research Publications                          227 Appropriated Funds & Extramural Funds (Ratio)                                           1.26 Animal Systems Number of Scientist FTE (Scientist Years)               26.09 Number of Research Publications                          263 Appropriated Funds & Extramural Funds (Ratio)                                           0.27 Health & Sustainable Communities Number of Scientist FTE (Scientist Years)               43.10 Number of Research Publications                          212 Appropriated Funds & Extramural Funds (Ratio)                                           0.37 A reporting of the degree to which the performance targets set above have been or are being achieved shall be provided in the agency's budget request submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee for Fiscal Year 2027. SECTION 8.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 9.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the funds herein appropriated shall be expended in compliance with Section 27-104-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, that no state agency shall incur obligations or indebtedness in excess of their appropriation and that the responsible officers, either personally or upon their official bonds, shall be held responsible for actions contrary to this provision. SECTION 10.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 11.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2025.